Utah statutes.
62A-4a-205.6.   Adoptive placement time frame -- Contracting with agencies.

(1)  With regard to a child who has a primary permanency goal of adoption or for whom a final plan for pursuing termination of parental rights has been approved in accordance with Section 78A-6-314, the division shall make intensive efforts to place the child in an adoptive home within 30 days of the earlier of:

(a)  approval of the final plan; or

(b)  establishment of the primary permanency goal.

(2)  If within the time periods described in Subsection (1) the division is unable to locate a suitable adoptive home, it shall contract with licensed child placing agencies to search for an appropriate adoptive home for the child, and to place the child for adoption.  The division shall comply with the requirements of Section 62A-4a-607 and contract with a variety of child placing agencies licensed under Part 6.  In accordance with federal law, the division shall develop plans for the effective use of cross-jurisdictional resources to facilitate timely adoptive or permanent placements for waiting children.

(3)  The division shall ensure that children who are adopted and were previously in its custody, continue to receive the medical and mental health coverage that they are entitled to under state and federal law.

(4)  The division may not consider a prospective adoptive parent's willingness or unwillingness to enter a postadoption contact agreement under Section 78B-6-146 as a condition of placing a child with the prospective adoptive parent.



Amended by Chapter 438, 2013 General Session

